src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Livonian noun inflection

This file documents `affixes/nouns.lexc`, the Livonian noun inflection file.

## Ad hoc lexica

PROBLEMS with dictionary lexica

* **LEXICON N_** 
* **LEXICON N_¤29** 

## Stem lexica
* **LEXICON N_PŪ** contains pū: 12
~156

* **LEXICON N_PŪ-PL** contains pū: 12

* **LEXICON N_RǬʼ** contains rǭʼ:rǭʼ 13

* **LEXICON N_PǞ** contains pǟ:pǟ 14

* **LEXICON N_TĪE** contains tīe:tīe 15

* **LEXICON N_TĪE-PL** contains tīe:tīe 15

* **LEXICON N_BRĪ** contains brī:brī 16

* **LEXICON N_TEI** contains tei:tei 17

* **LEXICON N_KUŖĒ** contains  kuŗē:kuʼŗŗē 18

* **LEXICON N_KALĀ** contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18

* **LEXICON N_KALĀ-SG** contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18

* **LEXICON N_KALĀ-PL** contains  kalā:kaʼlā 18

* **LEXICON N_IRĒ** contains  irē:iʼr 18

* **LEXICON N_IRĒ-SG** contains  irē:iʼr 18

* **LEXICON N_IRĒ-PL** contains  irē:iʼr 18

* **LEXICON N_TUBĀ** tubā:tuʼbā 19

* **LEXICON N_TUBĀ-SG** tubā:tuʼbā 19

* **LEXICON N_TUBĀ-PL** tubā:tuʼbā 19

* **LEXICON N_AMĀ** amā:aʼm 19a

* **LEXICON N_AMĀ-SG** amā:aʼm 19a

* **LEXICON N_AMĀ-PL** amā:aʼm 19a

* **LEXICON N_AIGĀ** aigā:aigā 20

* **LEXICON N_LĒBA** lēba:leiba 21

* **LEXICON N_KŪJA** kūja:lēba 21

* **LEXICON N_PŪOGA** pūoga:pūoga 22

* **LEXICON N_LǬJA** lǭja:lǭja 23

* **LEXICON N_LǬJA-SG** lǭja:lǭja 23

* **LEXICON N_LǬJA-PL** lǭja:lǭja 23

* **LEXICON N_PǞVA** pǟva:pǟva 24

* **LEXICON N_PǞVA-PL** pǟva:pǟva 24

* **LEXICON N_IZĀ** izā:izā 25

* **LEXICON N_PIEZĀ** piezā:pieʼzzā 25

* **LEXICON N_AŽĀ** ažā:aʼžā 26

* **LEXICON N_AŽĀ-SG** ažā:aʼžžā 26
* **LEXICON N_AŽĀ-PL** ažā:aʼžžā 26

* **LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA** āļdža:āļdža 27

* **LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA-SG** āļdža:āļdža 27

* **LEXICON N_ĀĻDŽA-PL** āļdža:āļdža 27

* **LEXICON N_SUKĀ** sukā:sukā 28

* **LEXICON N_LIEPĀ** liepā:liepā 29

* **LEXICON N_OKSĀ** oksā:oksā 30

* **LEXICON N_VȰNTSA** vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31

* **LEXICON N_LIESTĀ** liestā:liestā 32

* **LEXICON N_ĀIGA** āiga:āiga 33

* **LEXICON N_LĀNGA** lānga:lānga 33

* **LEXICON N_SĪLMA** sīlma:sīlma 34

* **LEXICON N_SĪLMA-PL** sīlma:sīlma 34

* **LEXICON N_KǞNGA** kǟnga:kǟnga 35

* **LEXICON N_ĀINA** āina:āina 36

* **LEXICON N_ĀINA-SG** āina:āina 36

* **LEXICON N_ĀINA-PL** āina:āina 36

* **LEXICON N_VĒNA** vēna:vēna 37

* **LEXICON N_RŌDA** rōda:rōda 38

* **LEXICON N_RŌDA-PL** rōda:rōda 38

* **LEXICON N_PADĀ** padā:padā 39

* **LEXICON N_PADĀ-SG** padā:padā 39

* **LEXICON N_PADĀ-PL** padā:padā 39

* **LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ** sõbrā:sõbrā 40

* **LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-SG** sõbrā:sõbrā 40

* **LEXICON N_SÕBRĀ-PL** sõbrā:sõbrā 40

* **LEXICON N_KÄPĀ** käpā:käpā 41

* **LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-SG** käpā:käpā 41

* **LEXICON N_KÄPĀ-PL** käpā:käpā 41

* **LEXICON N_MAKSĀ** maksā:maksā 42

* **LEXICON N_KĒRA** kēra:kēra 43

* **LEXICON N_JǬRA** jǭra:jǭra 44

* **LEXICON N_PŪOLA** pūola:pūola 45

* **LEXICON N_ĀITA** āita:āita 46

* **LEXICON N_ĀITA-PL** āita:āita 46

* **LEXICON N_ŪŠKA** ūška:ūška 47

* **LEXICON N_MȬKA** mȭka:mȭka 48

* **LEXICON N_DADŽĀ** dadžā:daʼdžā 49
* **LEXICON N_DADŽĀ-SG** dadžā:daʼdžā 49
* **LEXICON N_DADŽĀ-PL** dadžā:daʼdžā 49

* **LEXICON N_SUŠĀ** sušā:sušā 50

* **LEXICON N_KUPŠĀ** kupšā:kupšā 51

* **LEXICON N_TŠŪRTŠA** tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52

* **LEXICON N_SĒMḐA** sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53

* **LEXICON N_KRǬIPA** krǭipa:krǭipa 55

* **LEXICON N_LILLA** kuțā:kuțā 57

* **LEXICON N_KAFFE** kuțā:kuțā 57

* **LEXICON N_KUȚĀ** kuțā:kuțā 57

* **LEXICON N_NĒTŠA** nētša:nētša 58

* **LEXICON N_KIʼV** kiʼv:kiv 59

* **LEXICON N_KUOʼIG** kuoʼig:kuoʼig 60

* **LEXICON N_KEP** kep:kep aʼb 61
* **LEXICON N_KEP-SG** kep:kep aʼb 61
* **LEXICON N_KEP-PL** kep:kep aʼb 61

* **LEXICON N_KRUȚK** : 62

* **LEXICON N_KRÄMP** : 63

* **LEXICON N_PIʼŅ** piʼņ:piņ 64
* **LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-SG** piʼņ:piņ 64
* **LEXICON N_PIʼŅ-PL** piʼņ:piņ 64

* **LEXICON N_KUOȚ** : 65
* **LEXICON N_KUOȚ-PL** : 65

* **LEXICON N_VAKȚ** : 66

* **LEXICON N_REŅ** : 67

* **LEXICON N_OKŠ** : 68

* **LEXICON N_KAŠ** : 69

* **LEXICON N_DUŅTŠ** : 70

* **LEXICON N_TORĪ** : 71

* **LEXICON N_VAʼG** vaʼg:vag 72
* **LEXICON N_VAʼG-PL** vaʼg:vag 72

* **LEXICON N_KÕʼL** kõʼl:kõl 73

* **LEXICON N_SUʼG** suʼg:sug 74

* **LEXICON N_JOʼUG** joʼug:joug 75

* **LEXICON N_NIʼM** niʼm:nim 76
* **LEXICON N_NIʼM-PL** niʼm:nim 76

* **LEXICON N_USK** usk: 77

* **LEXICON N_VAŠK** : 78 vašk:vask

* **LEXICON N_TUP** tup:tup 79
* **LEXICON N_TUP-SG** tup:tup 79
* **LEXICON N_TUP-PL** tup:tup 79

* **LEXICON N_BIS** bis:bis 79
* **LEXICON N_BIS-SG** bis:bis 79
* **LEXICON N_BIS-PL** bis:bis 79

* **LEXICON N_MAKS** : 80
* **LEXICON N_MAKS-PL** : 80

* **LEXICON N_LUʼM** luʼm:lum 81

* **LEXICON N_MIEʼR** mieʼr:mier 82

* **LEXICON N_MEʼR** meʼr:mer 83

* **LEXICON N_MUʼR** muʼr:mur 84

* **LEXICON N_KUOʼD** kuoʼd:kuod aig 85

* **LEXICON N_SUʼŽ** suʼž:suž 86

* **LEXICON N_KEʼŽ** keʼž:kež aim 87

* **LEXICON N_VEʼŽ** veʼž:veʼž 88

* **LEXICON N_KUʼŽ** kuʼž:kuž 89

* **LEXICON N_RUZŪ** : 90

* **LEXICON N_RADIO** : 91

* **LEXICON N_ANG** : 92

* **LEXICON N_KOUV** : 93

* **LEXICON N_KAND** : 94
kand:kand
* **LEXICON N_KAND-SG** : 94
* **LEXICON N_KAND-PL** : 94

* **LEXICON N_KAITS** : 94
kaits:kaits
* **LEXICON N_KAITS-SG** : 94
* **LEXICON N_KAITS-PL** : 94

* **LEXICON N_SERK** : 94
serk:serk
* **LEXICON N_SERK-SG** : 94
* **LEXICON N_SERK-PL** : 94

* **LEXICON N_PȮRT** : 95

* **LEXICON N_NUŖM** : 96 nuŗm:nūrm

* **LEXICON N_SUOŖM** : 96b suoŗm:sūorm

* **LEXICON N_LAINT** : 97

* **LEXICON N_LOUL** : 98

* **LEXICON N_UL** : 99 ul:ul

* **LEXICON N_PAN** : 100

* **LEXICON N_TÄM** täm:tam 101 

* **LEXICON N_NIŖȚ** : 102

* **LEXICON N_KUĻ** : 103

* **LEXICON N_PAŅ** : 104

* **LEXICON N_DAŅTŠ** : 105

* **LEXICON N_KOUŠ** : 106

* **LEXICON N_SPLEIŠ** : 107

* **LEXICON N_VEIS** : 108

* **LEXICON N_PȮIS** : 109 pȯis:pȯis

* **LEXICON N_KIĻG** : 110

* **LEXICON N_VȮĻG** : 111

* **LEXICON N_TÄUŽ** täuž:täud adres 112
N_SgGen/d-Nom/ž-Par//ta
**täuž:täud**
* **LEXICON N_TÄUŽ-SG** : 116
* **LEXICON N_TÄUŽ-PL** : 116

* **LEXICON N_VAŖŽ** : 113

* **LEXICON N_PIERZ** : 114

* **LEXICON N_VÕRGÕ** : 115

* **LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ** : 116
N_SgPar/VowsLI1/ța-PlPar/VowsRM/idi
**jõugõ:jõugõ**
* **LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ-SG** : 116
* **LEXICON N_JÕUGÕ-PL** : 116

* **LEXICON N_VȬIDAG** : 117

* **LEXICON N_SIELDÕ** : 118
* **LEXICON N_SIELDÕ-PL** : 118

* **LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
* **LEXICON N_NǬʼGÕ-PL** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119

* **LEXICON N_AŠŠÕ-PL** : 120

* **LEXICON N_SOʼV** : 122
* **LEXICON N_SOʼV-PL** : 122

* **LEXICON N_KǬJ** : 123
* **LEXICON N_KǬJ-PL** : 123

* **LEXICON N_ǬʼJ** ǭʼj:ǭj 124

* **LEXICON N_IRM** : 125
* **LEXICON N_IRM-PL** : 125

* **LEXICON N_KIM** : 126
* **LEXICON N_KIM-SG** : 126
* **LEXICON N_KIM-PL** : 126

* **LEXICON N_PLUS** : 126b

* **LEXICON N_VȮŅ** : 127

* **LEXICON N_VAʼIT** vaʼit:vait 128

* **LEXICON N_VAʼIT-PL** vaʼit:vait 128

* **LEXICON N_AMĀT** : 129

* **LEXICON N_AMĀT-PL** : 129

* **LEXICON N_KULTŪR** : 130

* **LEXICON N_SAʼGDIT** saʼgdit:sagdit 131

* **LEXICON N_VIĻȚ** : 132
* **LEXICON N_VIĻȚ-PL** : 132

* **LEXICON N_GĒRMAŅ** : 132
* **LEXICON N_GĒRMAŅ-PL** : 132

* **LEXICON N_EĻ** : 133

* **LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134

* **LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ-SG** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
* **LEXICON N_BLĒʼḐ-PL** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134

* **LEXICON N_FAKT** : 135
* **LEXICON N_FAKT-PL** : 135

* **LEXICON N_TAS** : 136

* **LEXICON N_NEITST** neitst:neits 137

* **LEXICON N_ĀIGAST** : 140
* **LEXICON N_ĀIGAST-PL** : 140

* **LEXICON N_ADRES** : 140

* **LEXICON N_ANALĪZ** : 141

* **LEXICON N_NĪʼEM** nīʼem:nīem 142

* **LEXICON N_KĪʼL** nīʼem:nīem 142

* **LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ** : 143

* **LEXICON N_JAĻKŠ-PL** : 143

* **LEXICON N_VIŠ** : 144 viš:viš
* **LEXICON N_VIŠ-SG** : 144
* **LEXICON N_VIŠ-PL** : 144

* **LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ** rūʼtš:rūtš 145

* **LEXICON N_RŪʼTŠ-PL** rūʼtš:rūtš 145

* **LEXICON N_TĒʼḐ** tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146

* **LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ** lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
* **LEXICON N_LĒʼḐ-PL** lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147

* **LEXICON N_KĪNTŠ** : 148

* **LEXICON N_KǬŅTŠ** : 149

* **LEXICON N_LĒŅTŠ** : 150

* **LEXICON N_LĪEM** : 151

* **LEXICON N_AʼM** aʼm:am 152

* **LEXICON N_AZŪM** : 153 azūm:aʼzūm
* **LEXICON N_AZŪM-SG** : 153
* **LEXICON N_AZŪM-PL** : 153

* **LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM** võțīm:võțīm 154 
* **LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-SG** : 154
* **LEXICON N_VÕȚĪM-PL** : 154

* **LEXICON N_KǬŅIM** : 155
* **LEXICON N_KǬŅIM-SG** : 155
* **LEXICON N_KǬŅIM-PL** : 155

* **LEXICON N_ĒTAM** : 156
* **LEXICON N_ĒTAM-SG** : 156
* **LEXICON N_ĒTAM-PL** : 156

* **LEXICON N_SIDĀM** : 157
* **LEXICON N_SIDĀM-PL** : 157

* **LEXICON N_TŪOITÕG** : 158

* **LEXICON N_KǬRAND** : 159
* Yaml: **armtõb**
* **LEXICON N_KǬRAND-SG** : 159
* **LEXICON N_KǬRAND-PL** : 159

* **LEXICON N_ȬʼDÕG** ȭʼdõg:ȭdõg 160

* **LEXICON N_TAPTÕD** : 161

* **LEXICON N_TUOISTÕNZ** : 164

* **LEXICON N_MĪEZ** mīez:m 166

* **LEXICON N_ROʼVZ** : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
* **LEXICON N_ROʼVZ-SG** : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
* **LEXICON N_ROʼVZ-PL** : 167 roʼvz:roʼv

* **LEXICON N_NÕTKĀZ** : 170

* **LEXICON N_RIKĀZ-PL** rikāz: 171

* __LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ__ : 172
* **LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-SG** : 172
* **LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-PL** : 172

* **LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ** : 173
* **LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ-PL** : 173

* **LEXICON N_PŪŖAZ** : 174

* __LEXICON N_RĒNAZ__ : 176
* **LEXICON N_RĒNAZ-PL** : 176

* **LEXICON N_TŌVAZ** : 177

* **LEXICON N_PŪORAZ** pūoraz: 178

* **LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ** mõtkõz: 179
* **LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ-PL** mõtkõz: 179

* **LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ** vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
* **LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-SG** vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
* **LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-PL** vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180

* **LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ** : 181 arāgõz:arāgõ
* **LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-SG** : 181
* **LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-PL** : 181

* **LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ** äʼggõz:äggõz 182
* **LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL** äʼggõz:äggõz 182

* **LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ** pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183

* **LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL** pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183

* **LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ** : 184
* **LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL** : 184

* **LEXICON N_LǬʼTŠÕZ** lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185

* **LEXICON N_SĒJI** : 186

* **LEXICON N_AKKIJI** akkiji:akkiji 187
* **LEXICON N_AKKIJI-SG** : 187
* **LEXICON N_AKKIJI-PL** : 187

* **LEXICON N_LĒʼJI** lēʼji:lēji 188
* **LEXICON N_LĒʼJI-SG** lēʼji:lēji 188
* **LEXICON N_LĒʼJI-PL** lēʼji:lēji 188

* **LEXICON N_TUĻĻI** : 189

* **LEXICON N_LÄʼBḐI** läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190

* **LEXICON N_NAI** : 191

* **LEXICON N_AʼIGI** aʼigi:aigi 192
* **LEXICON N_AʼIGI-PL** aʼigi:aigi 192

* **LEXICON N_PUʼNNI** puʼnni:punni 193
* **LEXICON N_PUʼNNI-PL** puʼnni:punni 193

* **LEXICON N_KAȚKI** kațki: 194

* **LEXICON N_KUKKI** kukki: 195

* **LEXICON N_TŪĻI** : 199
~422
* **LEXICON N_TŪĻI-PL** : 199

* **LEXICON N_AʼBLI** aʼbli:aʼbli 200
~567

* **LEXICON N_AʼBLI-SG** aʼbli:aʼbli 200
* **LEXICON N_AʼBLI-PL** aʼbli:aʼbli 200

* **LEXICON N_SĒMI** : 201

* **LEXICON N_SĒMI-SG** : 201
* **LEXICON N_SĒMI-PL** : 201

* **LEXICON N_LĒʼMI** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202

* **LEXICON N_LĒʼMI-SG** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
* **LEXICON N_LĒʼMI-PL** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202

* **LEXICON N_ALĪZ** : 203
* **LEXICON N_ALĪZ-SG** : 203
* **LEXICON N_ALĪZ-PL** : 203

* **LEXICON N_NȬŖKÕZ** : 204

* **LEXICON N_KATŪKS** : 205

* **LEXICON N_KATŪKS-PL** : 205

* **LEXICON N_ĀNDÕKS** āndõks: 206
* **LEXICON N_ĀNDÕKS-PL** āndõks: 206

* **LEXICON N_KĒRATÕKS** kēratõks:kēratõks 207

* **LEXICON N_ÄʼBȚÕKS** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
* **LEXICON N_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208

* **LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ** : 209

* **LEXICON N_UKŠ** : 210

* **LEXICON N_LÄPŠ** läpš:laps 211
* **LEXICON N_LÄPŠ-PL** läpš:laps 211

* **LEXICON N_ROʼVZT-PL** roʼvzt:roʼvz 212

* **LEXICON N_TUʼĻ** : 213

* **LEXICON N_TŪĻ** : 214

* **LEXICON N_KĒĻ** kēļ:kēl 215

* **LEXICON N_PŪOL** : 216 pūol:pūol

* **LEXICON N_PŪOL-PL** : 216

* **LEXICON N_ĪKŠ** : 217

* **LEXICON N_SĒŅ** sēņ:sēn 220

* **LEXICON N_JŪŖ** jūŗ:jūr 221
* **LEXICON N_JŪŖ-PL** : 221

* **LEXICON N_SŪR** : 222

* **LEXICON N_SĒR** : 223

* **LEXICON N_BIRKOV** : 224 birkov:birkov
* **LEXICON N_BIRKOV-SG** : 224	birkov:birkov
* **LEXICON N_BIRKOV-PL** : 224	birkov:birkov

* **LEXICON N_SALĀJ** : 225

* **LEXICON N_UMĀRZ** umārz:umār 226
